Massachusetts, session 194th, H4100.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriation act 
and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2025, the sums set forth in section 2 are hereby 
appropriated from the General Fund unless specifically designated otherwise in this act or in 
those appropriation acts, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this 
act or in those appropriation acts, and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public 
funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.  These sums shall be in addition to any amounts 
previously appropriated and made available for the purposes of those items.  These sums shall be 
made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. 
SECTION 2. 

of 2 10 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE 
Group Insurance Commission 
1108-5200 Group Insurance Premium and Plan Costs..........................................$240,000,000